zh-TW: 手指數: 1 指; 2 指; 3 指; 4 指; 5 指; 其他
sl-SI: Štetje prstov: Za 1 prst; Za 2 prsta; Za 3 prste; Za 4 prste; Za 5 prstov; Drugo
sv: Antal fingrar: 1-finger; 2-finger; 3-finger; 4-finger; 5-finger; Övrigt
es: Cantidad de dedos: 1 dedo; 2 dedos; 3 dedos; 4 dedos; 5 dedos; Otro
fi: Sormien lukumäärä: 1-sorminen; 2-sorminen; 3-sorminen; 4-sorminen; 5-sorminen; Muu
ro-RO: Numărul de degete: 1 deget; 2 degete; 3 degete; 4 degete; 5 degete; Altele
ja: 指の数: 1本指; 2本指; 3本指; 4本指; 5本指; その他
en: Finger count: 1-finger; 2-finger; 3-finger; 4-finger; 5-finger; Other
vi: Số ngón tay: 1 ngón; 2 ngón; 3 ngón; 4 ngón; 5 ngón; Khác
th: การนับนิ้ว: 1 นิ้ว; 2 นิ้ว; 3 นิ้ว; 4 นิ้ว; 5 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
cs: Počítání prstů: 1prstové; 2prstové; 3prstové; 4prstové; 5prstové; Jiné
nb: Fingertelling: 1-finger; 2-finger; 3-finger; 4-finger; 5-finger; Annet
nl: Vinger aantal: 1 vinger; 2 vingers; 3 vingers; 4 vingers; 5 vingers; Overige
sk-SK: Počet prstov: Na 1 prst; Na 2 prsty; Na 3 prsty; Na 4 prsty; Na 5 prstov; Iné
bg-BG: Брой пръсти: С 1 пръст; С 2 пръста; С 3 пръста; С 4 пръста; С 5 пръста; Други
zh-CN: 手指计数: 1 指; 2 指; 3 指; 4 指; 5 指; 其他
it: Conteggio delle dita: 1 dito; 2 dita; 3 dita; 4 dita; 5 dita; Altro
hu: Ujjak száma: 1 ujjas; 2 ujjas; 3 ujjas; 4 ujjas; 5 ujjas; Egyéb
el: Αριθμός δακτύλων: 1 δάχτυλο; 2 δάχτυλα; 3 δάχτυλα; 4 δάχτυλα; 5 δάχτυλα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Contagem de dedos: 1 dedo; 2 dedos; 3 dedos; 4 dedos; 5 dedos; Outros
de: Anzahl der Finger: 1-Finger; 2-Finger; 3-Finger; 4-Finger; 5-Finger; Sonstige
pl: Liczba palców: 1-palczaste; 2-palczaste; 3-palczaste; 4-palczaste; 5-palczaste; Inne
tr: Parmak sayımı: 1 parmaklı; 2 parmaklı; 3 parmaklı; 4 parmaklı; 5 parmaklı; Diğer
fr: Nombre de doigts: 1 doigt; 2 doigts; 3 doigts; 4 doigts; 5 doigts; Autre
hr-HR: Brojanje prstiju: 1 prst; 2 prsta; 3 prsta; 4 prsta; 5 prstiju; Ostalo
da: Fingerantal: 1 finger; 2 fingre; 3 fingre; 4 fingre; 5 fingre; Andet
pt-PT: Contagem de dedos: 1 dedo; 2 dedos; 3 dedos; 4 dedos; 5 dedos; Outro
ru: Количество пальцев: 1 палец; 2 пальца; 3 пальца; 4 пальца; 5 пальцев; Другое
lt-LT: Pirštų skaičius: 1 piršto; 2 pirštų; 3 pirštų; 4 pirštų; 5 pirštų; Kita
ko: 손가락 수: 1핑거; 2핑거; 3핑거; 4핑거; 5핑거; 기타